nl: Tandpastatype: Anti-bederf; Anticalculus; Antiplaque; Desensibiliserend; Witmakend; Andere
fr: Type de dentifrice: Anti-calcaire; Anti-tartre; Anti-plaque; Désensibilisant; Blanchissant; Autre
pl: Typ pasty do zębów: Zapobieganie gniciu; Zapobieganiu osadzaniu się kamienia; Zapobieganie powstawaniu płytki nazębnej; Odczulanie; Wybielanie; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de pasta de dentes: Antidegradação; Antitártaro; Antiplaca; Dessensibilizante; Branqueadora; Outro
th: ประเภทยาสีฟัน: ต่อต้านการผุกร่อน; ต้านการสะสมหินปูน; ป้องกันคราบพลัค; ทนต่ออาการแพ้; ไวท์เทนนิ่ง; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος οδοντόκρεμας: Κατά της φθοράς; Αντιλογισμός; Αντιπλάκα; Απευαισθητοποίηση; Λεύκανση; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta zubne paste: Protiv propadanja; Protiv zubnog kamenca; Protiv stvaranja plaka; Desenzibilizacija; Izbjeljivanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de pasta de dente: Anticárie; Anticálculo; Antiplaca; Dessensibilização; Branqueamento; Outro
bg-BG: Вид паста за зъби: Против кариес; Против зъбен камък; Против плака; Десенсибилизираща; Избелващa; Други
vi: Loại kem đánh răng: Chống sâu răng; Kem đánh răng chống vôi răng; Kem đánh răng chống mảng bám; Kem đánh răng giảm ê buốt; Kem đánh răng làm trắng; Khác
nb: Tannpastatype: Antiråte; Antitannstein; Antiplakk; Desensiterende; Blekende; Annet
sv: Typ av tandkräm: Anti-förfall; Antikalksten; Antiplack; Desensibiliserande; Blekning; Övrigt
zh-TW: 牙膏類型: 防蛀牙; 防牙垢; 防形菌班; 防敏; 美白; 其他
it: Tipo di dentifricio: Anti-decadimento; Anticalcolo; Antiplacca; Desensibilizzante; Sbiancante; Altro
ja: 歯磨き粉の種類: 虫歯防止; 歯石防止; アンチプラーク; 減感; ホワイトニング; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta zobne paste: Proti razpadanju; Proti zobnemu kamnu; Proti zobnim oblogam; Proti občutljivosti; Beljenje; Drugo
ru: Тип зубной пасты: Против кариеса; Против камня; Против налета; Снижение чувствительности; Отбеливание; Другое
de: Zahnpastatyp: Gegen Karies; Gegen Zahnsteinbildung; Antiplaque; Desensibilisierung; Aufhellend; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip pastă de dinți: Combate cariile; Combate tartrul; Combate placa bacteriană; Desensibilizare; Albire; Altele
hu: Fogkrém típusa: Fogszuvasodás ellen; Foglepedék ellen; Fogplakk ellen; Érzékenységcsökkentő; Fehérítő; Egyéb
fi: Hammastahnatyyppi: Karieksenesto; Hammaskiveä vastaan; Plakinesto; Herkkyyttä vähentävä; Valkaiseva; Muu
zh-CN: 牙膏类型: 防腐烂; 防牙垢; 防牙菌斑; 脱敏; 美白; 其他
tr: Diş Macunu Türü: Çürüme önleyici; Diş taşı karşıtı; Antiplak; Hassasiyet giderici; Beyazlatıcı; Diğer
en: Toothpaste type: Anti-decay; Anticalculus; Antiplaque; Desensitizing; Whitening; Other
da: Tandpastatype: Anti-henfald; Anticalculus; Antiplak; Desensibiliserende; Blegende; Andet
ko: 치약 유형: 충치 방지; 치석 방지; 플라그 방지; 둔감화; 미백; 기타
sk-SK: Typ zubnej pasty: Proti rozkladu; Proti zubnému kameňu; Proti vzniku plaku; Desenzibilizujúci; Bielenie; Iné
es: Tipo de pasta de dientes: Antiescaras; Anticalculina; Antiplaca; Desensibilizante; Blanqueamiento; Otros
lt-LT: Dantų pastos tipas: Nuo ėduonies; Nuo akmenų susidarymo; Nuo apnašų; Dantų jautrumą mažinanti; Balinamoji; Kita
cs: Typ zubní pasty: Proti zubnímu kazu; Proti zubnímu kameni; Proti zubnímu plaku; Znecitlivující; Bělicí; Jiné